Utah statutes.
17-27a-204.   Notice of public hearings and public meetings to consider
general plan or modifications.
(1)  A county shall provide:
(a)  notice of the date, time, and place of the first public hearing to
consider the original adoption or any modification of all or any portion of a
general plan; and
(b)  notice of each public meeting on the subject.
(2)  Each notice of a public hearing under Subsection (1)(a) shall be at least
10 calendar days before the public hearing and shall be:
(a) (i)  published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area; and
(ii)  published in accordance with Section 45-1-101;
(b)  mailed to each affected entity; and
(c)  posted:
(i)  in at least three public locations within the county; or
(ii)  on the county's official website.
(3)  Each notice of a public meeting under Subsection (1)(b) shall be at least
24 hours before the meeting and shall be:
(a) (i)  submitted to a newspaper of general circulation in the area; and
(ii)  published in accordance with Section 45-1-101; and
(b)  posted:
(i)  in at least three public locations within the county; or
(ii)  on the county's official website.
